Mississippi statutes. Title 1. Laws and Statutes
In General

§§ 1-1-1 through 1-1-6.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).

§§1-1-1 through1-1-6. [Codes, 1942, §§ 21-01 through 21-03, 21-10; Laws, 1970, ch. 465, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1970, ch. 394, § 5]

§ 1-1-7.
Contents.

The Mississippi Code of 1972 shall cover all sections of and amendments to the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Mississippi; all operative and effective sections of the Mississippi Code of 1930 and amendments thereto; all operative and effective sections of the Mississippi Code of 1942, Recompiled, and amendments thereto; and all operative and effective session laws of a general and permanent nature enacted since the publication of the Mississippi Code of 1930 down through the 1971 Regular Session of the Legislature.

The Mississippi Code of 1972 shall contain, in addition to the material set out above, case notes or case statements covering pertinent court decisions construing or applying Mississippi statutes, volume and general indexes, and such other useful matters, tables, information, and ancillaries as the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation deems to be desirable and practicable to include. Opinions of the Attorney General also may be annotated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 1; 1871, § 1; 1880, § 1; 1892, § 1; 1906, § 1; 1930, § 1; 1942, §§ 2, 4, 12, 21-04; Laws, 1942, ch. 318; Laws, 1970, ch. 465, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 7; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-8.
Official code; recognition as evidence of public statute laws; restrictions on use of certain words or names in title of codes other than official version.

The Mississippi Code of 1972 Annotated, as amended, modified and revised from time to time, that is published by the company with which the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation has contracted under Section 1-1-107(a):

Is the official code of the public statute laws of the State of Mississippi that are enacted by the Legislature; and

Shall be used, received, recognized and referred to as the official code of the public statute laws of the State of Mississippi, and shall be considered as evidence of the public statute laws of the State of Mississippi, in all courts of the State and by all public officers, offices, departments and agencies of the state and its political subdivisions, and in all other places or instances where the public statute laws of the State may come into question. However, if there is any conflict between the language of any statute as it appears in the Mississippi Code of 1972 Annotated and in the General Laws of Mississippi, the language in the General Laws shall control; and if there is any conflict between the language of any statute as it appears in the General Laws of Mississippi and in the original enrolled bills enacted by the Legislature, the language in the enrolled bills shall control.

No publisher of a code of the public statute laws of the State of Mississippi, other than the publishing company with which the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation has contracted under Section 1-1-107(a), shall be authorized to use as the name, title or designation of the code that is published, the words “Mississippi Code of 1972,” “Mississippi Code 1972,” “Mississippi Code of 1972 Annotated,” “Mississippi Code 1972 Annotated,” “Annotated Mississippi Code of 1972,” “Annotated Mississippi Code 1972,” or any other combination of words containing “Code of 1972,” “Code 1972” or “1972 Code.” The joint committee may seek injunctive relief, or authorize the publisher of the official code to seek injunctive relief on behalf of the joint committee, against any person or entity to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 310, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 8, 1999).

§ 1-1-9.
Copyright; use of code material.

Copyrights of the Mississippi Code of 1972 and the notes, annotations, and indexes thereof, shall be taken by and in the name of the publishers of the compilation who shall thereafter promptly assign the same to the State of Mississippi and be owned by it.

All parts of any act passed by the Mississippi Legislature, or of any code published or authorized to be published by the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, including, without limitation, catchlines or frontal analyses; numbers assigned to sections, articles, chapters and titles; historical citations or source lines; editor’s notes; amendment notes; cross references; annotations; and summaries of judicial decisions and Attorney General’s opinions, shall become and remain the exclusive property of the State of Mississippi, to be used only as the joint committee may direct.

If any person or entity uses any part of any act passed by the Mississippi Legislature, or any part of any code published or authorized to be published by the joint committee, in any manner other than as authorized by the committee, the person or entity shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation, and each day upon which a violation occurs shall be deemed a separate and additional violation.

If the joint committee suspects that any person or entity is violating or has violated this section, the Attorney General shall investigate the matter upon the request of the joint committee. If the Attorney General determines, after investigation, that the person or entity is violating or has violated this section, the Attorney General shall institute an action to impose a civil penalty against the person or entity, or seek injunctive relief against the person or entity to prevent further violations of this section, or both, as requested by the joint committee.

Civil penalties may be recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, or in the chancery court of the county of residence of the person or entity against whom the penalty is sought. If the person or entity is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, the action shall be brought in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

All civil penalties recovered shall be deposited into the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8; Laws, 1942, ch. 318; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 8; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-11.
Distribution of the Code of 1972.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation shall distribute or provide for the distribution of the sets of the compilation of the Mississippi Code of 1972 purchased by the state as follows:

Fifty-seven (57) sets to the Mississippi House of Representatives and forty (40) sets to the Mississippi Senate for the use of the Legislative Reference Bureau, Legislative Services Offices, staffs and committees thereof.

Ten (10) sets to the Governor’s Office; nine (9) sets to the Secretary of State; and twenty (20) sets to the Auditor’s Office.

One (1) set to each of the following: the Lieutenant Governor; each member of the Legislature; the Treasurer; each district attorney; each county attorney; each judge of the Court of Appeals and each judge of the Supreme, circuit, chancery, county, family, justice and municipal courts; each Mississippi Senator and Mississippi Representative in Congress; State Superintendent of Education; Director of the Department of Finance and Administration; six (6) sets to the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) Committee; three (3) sets to the Director of the Legislative Budget Office; the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce; each Mississippi Transportation Commissioner; six (6) sets to the Department of Corrections; the Insurance Commissioner; the Clerk of the Supreme Court; the State Board of Health; each circuit clerk; each chancery clerk in the state for the use of the chancery clerk and the board of supervisors; each sheriff in the state for the use of his office and the county officers; and each county for the county library (and an additional set shall be given to each circuit clerk, chancery clerk, sheriff and county library in counties having two (2) judicial districts).

Two (2) sets to the Department of Archives and History; two (2) sets to the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission; sixty-eight (68) sets to the Attorney General’s office; six (6) sets to the Public Service Commission; four (4) sets to the Public Utilities Staff; thirty-five (35) sets to the Department of Revenue; one (1) set to the Board of Tax Appeals; two (2) sets to the State Personnel Board; six (6) sets to the State Law Library; one (1) set to the Library of Congress; ten (10) sets to the University of Mississippi Law School; one (1) set each to the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind; one (1) set each to the University of Mississippi, Mississippi State University, Mississippi University for Women, University of Southern Mississippi, Delta State University, Alcorn State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University, and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning; and one (1) set to the Supreme Court judges’ conference room. In furtherance of the State Library’s reciprocal program of code exchange with libraries of the several states, the joint committee shall, at the direction and only upon the written request of the State Librarian, distribute or provide for the distribution of sets of the code to such libraries.

One (1) set to each state junior or community college; three (3) sets to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks; two (2) sets to the Department of Environmental Quality; two (2) sets to the Department of Marine Resources; two (2) sets to the Mississippi Ethics Commission; six (6) sets to the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission; four (4) sets to the State Department of Rehabilitation Services; and seven (7) sets to the Department of Human Services. One (1) set to each of the following: State Textbook Procurement Commission; University Medical Center; State Library Commission; Department of Agriculture and Commerce; Forestry Commission; and seventeen (17) sets to the Department of Public Safety. Also, one (1) set to each of the following: Adjutant General, Mississippi Development Authority, Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, the State Educational Finance Commission, the Mississippi Board of Vocational and Technical Education, Division of Medicaid, State Board of Mental Health, and Department of Youth Services.

The joint committee is authorized to distribute or provide for the distribution of additional sets of the Mississippi Code, not to exceed three (3) sets, to the office of each district attorney for the use of his assistants.

The joint committee shall provide to the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate the annual supplements to the Mississippi Code of 1972 for each set of the code maintained by the House and Senate.

The set of the Mississippi Code of 1972 to be provided to each member of the Legislature shall be provided unless specifically waived by such legislator in writing.

An elected or appointed officeholder in the State of Mississippi, except for a member of the Legislature, shall deliver to his successor in office, or to the joint committee if there is no successor, the set of the Mississippi Code of 1972 provided the officeholder under this section.

Before the joint committee delivers or provides for delivery of a copy of the Mississippi Code of 1972 to an individual officeholder, the joint committee shall prepare and submit a written agreement to the officeholder. The agreement shall, among other provisions, state that the code is the property of the State of Mississippi, that it shall be transferred to the officeholder’s successor in office, that the officeholder has an obligation to make such transfer and that the officeholder shall be responsible for the failure to deliver the code and for any damage or destruction to the code, normal wear and tear excepted. The joint committee shall execute the agreement and forward it to the officeholder for execution. The joint committee shall not deliver or provide for delivery of the code to the officeholder until the executed agreement is received by the committee. The joint committee may include in the agreement such other provisions as it may deem reasonable and necessary. In addition to damages or any other remedy for not transferring a set of the code to his successor, an officeholder who does not transfer his set of the code shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, pay a fine of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). Upon request of the joint committee, the Attorney General shall assist the joint committee in taking such actions as necessary to require an officeholder to transfer the set of code provided under this section to his successor, or to the joint committee if there is no successor, and to recover reimbursement or damages from any officeholder for the loss of or damage or destruction to any volumes of the set of the code provided under this section, other than normal wear and tear.

Replacement of missing, damaged or destroyed sets or volumes of the code provided by this chapter may be obtained from the code publisher through the joint committee at the established state cost, the cost to be borne by the recipient.

No more than one (1) set of the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall be furnished to any one (1) individual, regardless of the office or offices he may hold.

The joint committee, in its discretion, may determine whether electronic access to the Mississippi Code of 1972 is available and a sufficient substitute for actual bound volumes of the code and, if so, may omit furnishing any one or more sets otherwise required by this section.

Each elected state official, elected state district official and member of the Legislature shall receive a CD-ROM version of the Mississippi Code of 1972 in lieu of bound volumes of the Mississippi Code of 1972 unless the official or member of the Legislature makes a request in writing to the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation that he receive bound volumes of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7; Laws, 1942, ch. 318; Laws, 1944, ch. 314; Laws, 1966, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 377; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 14; Laws, 1990, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 11; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 551, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 1-1-12.
Binding and identification of state-owned copies of Code of 1972.

The sets of the Mississippi Code of 1972 purchased by the State to be distributed by the joint committee according to the designation in Section 1-1-11 shall be bound in a different color binding from that used in binding sets offered for sale to private purchasers. In addition to the distinctive color, the binding of each volume shall have stamped thereon in a contrasting color the words “Property of the State of Mississippi.” Each of such sets of the Code as distributed shall be for use of the official in his official business and shall be returned to the state when the official vacates the office or when the office is abolished, as provided in Section 1-1-11. However, none of the provisions of this section shall apply to those sets to be distributed to members of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7.5; Laws, 1972, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 425, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-13.
When Code of 1972 to take effect.

The Mississippi Code of 1972, except as expressly provided, shall take effect on the first day of November, one thousand nine hundred and seventy-three, and from that day it shall be received in use, and shall supersede all prior statutes and clauses therein revised, and hereby repealed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 2; 1871, § 8; 1880, § 2; 1892, § 2; 1906, § 2; 1930, § 2; 1942, § 13.

§ 1-1-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1999, ch. 310, § 3, eff from and after March 8, 1999.

§1-1-15. [Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 13; 1871, § 12; 1880, § 9; 1892, § 9; Laws, 1906, § 9; Laws, 1930, § 9; Laws, 1942, §§ 9, 20; Laws, 1942, ch. 318]

§ 1-1-17.
Appropriations.

The cost of the recodification of the laws of Mississippi will be provided by appropriations to implement the purposes of Sections 1-1-1, 1-1-3 and 1-1-5.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 21-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 465, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 1-1-19.
Repeal of former statutes — Effect of Code of 1972 upon laws enacted at same session or before Code takes effect.

From and after the effective date of the Mississippi Code of 1972, subject to any express provisions relating thereto which may be found in the Mississippi Code of 1972, all acts or parts of acts, all sections or parts of sections of the Mississippi Code of 1930, and all sections or parts of sections of the Mississippi Code of 1942, Recompiled, the subjects whereof are revised, consolidated and re-enacted in the Mississippi Code of 1972, or repugnant to the provisions contained therein, shall be, and the same are hereby, repealed, but with respect to statutes brought forward in the Mississippi Code of 1972, that code shall be deemed to be a continuation and not a new enactment. It is especially provided, however, that no curative or validation statute, of any nature or kind whatsoever, shall be affected by the adoption of the Mississippi Code of 1972, in so far as the curative or validation provisions or portions of any such statute are concerned.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the first paragraph of this section, no section or provision of the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall supersede or repeal by implication any law passed at the same session of the legislature at which the Mississippi Code of 1972 is adopted, or passed after the adoption of the Mississippi Code of 1972 but before it shall have taken effect; and an amendatory law passed at such session or at any subsequent session before the Mississippi Code of 1972 takes effect shall not be deemed repealed, unless the contrary intent clearly appears.

Any amendment to any section or sections of the Mississippi Code of 1942, Recompiled, or to any part or parts of acts, the subjects of which are revised, consolidated and enacted in the Mississippi Code of 1972, passed at the same session at which the Mississippi Code of 1972 is adopted, or passed after the adoption of the Mississippi Code of 1972 but before it shall take effect, shall be deemed to amend the corresponding section or sections of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 3; 1871, § 9; 1880, § 3; 1892, § 3; 1906, § 3; 1930, § 3; 1942, § 14.

§ 1-1-21.
Effect of repeals by Code of 1972 upon former rights.

The repeal of any statutory provisions by the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall not affect any act done, or any cause of action, or any right accruing or accrued or established, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced in any civil case, or any plea or defense or bar thereto, previous to the time when such repeal shall take place; but the proceedings in every such case shall be conformed, as far as practicable, to the provisions of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 5; 1871, § 13; 1880, § 4; 1892, § 4; 1906, § 4; 1930, § 4; 1942, § 15.

§ 1-1-22.
Prior rights or actions involving taxes unaffected.

Nothing in Section 1-1-35 shall affect or defeat any claim, assessment, suit, appeal right or cause of action for taxes due prior to April 26, 1972, whether such assessment, suit, appeal, or claim therefor shall have been begun before said date, or shall thereafter be begun; and the laws amended or repealed are expressly continued in full force, effect and operation for the purpose of the assessment and collection of any taxes due under any such laws prior to said date, and for the imposition of any penalty, forfeiture, or claim for a failure to comply therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 21-09; Laws, 1972, ch. 394, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 1-1-23.
Effect of adoption of Code of 1972 upon offenses committed prior to effective date of Code.

An offense committed, and a penalty or forfeiture incurred, previous to the time when the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall take effect, and an indictment or prosecution for any offense, or for the recovery of any penalty or forfeiture, pending at the time when the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall take effect, shall not be affected by its adoption; but all such offenses, penalties, and forfeitures shall remain subject to the laws in force before the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall take effect, except that all the proceedings had thereafter shall be conducted according to the provisions thereof, and except that when any punishment, penalty, or forfeiture shall have been mitigated by the provisions of the Mississippi Code of 1972, such provisions may be applied to any judgment to be pronounced after the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall take effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 6; 1871, § 14; 1880, § 5; 1892, § 5; 1906, § 5; 1930, § 5; 1942, § 16.

§ 1-1-24.
Prior violations of law and civil causes of action unaffected.

Nothing in Section 1-1-35 shall be construed to defeat or affect in any manner whatsoever the prosecution of any person, association, firm or corporation, for the violation of any law occurring prior to the first day of November, 1973 in any court of record, the trial therefor, or appeal therefrom, and nothing in Section 1-1-35 shall be construed to defeat or affect in any manner whatsoever any right of a civil cause of action in equity or law in any court of record, the trial thereof, or appeal therefrom occurring prior to the first day of November, 1973.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 21-08; Laws, 1972, ch. 394, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 1-1-25.
No revival of repealed laws.

All statutes and parts of statutes which are repealed or abrogated by, or are repugnant to any law repealed by the Mississippi Code of 1972, and which have not been re-enacted or consolidated therein, shall continue to be so repealed, and shall remain abrogated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 7; 1871, § 15; 1880, § 6; 1892, § 6; 1906, § 6; 1930, § 6; 1942, § 17.

§ 1-1-27.
Vacation of offices by adoption of Code of 1972.

The repeal of any statutory provision which is revised and consolidated in the Mississippi Code of 1972, by virtue of which any appointment shall have been made or any office is held, shall not be construed to vacate the office, or in any way to affect the appointment, except when otherwise expressly provided; but the appointment shall continue and the office shall be held subject to the provisions contained in the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 9; 1871, § 16; 1880, § 7; 1892, § 7; 1906, § 7; 1930, § 7; 1942, § 18.

§ 1-1-29.
Effect of adoption of Code of 1972 upon private and local laws.

Private and local laws not revised and brought into the Mississippi Code of 1972 are not affected by its adoption unless it is expressly so provided therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 1, art. 8; 1871, § 10; 1880, § 8; 1892, § 8; 1906, § 8; 1930, § 8; 1942, § 19.

§ 1-1-31.
Severability provision of Code of 1972.

If any chapter, article, section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase or any part of the Mississippi Code of 1972 is declared to be unconstitutional or void, or for any reason is declared to be invalid or of no effect, the remaining chapters, articles, sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses and phrases shall be in no manner affected thereby but shall remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 10; 1942, § 21.

§ 1-1-33.
Code of 1972 supplied to officers.

Where any officer has received a set of the Mississippi Code of 1972 by virtue of his office and is required by law to deliver it to his successor in office, and the officer fails to deliver it to his successor, the successor may make application to the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, in writing, setting forth that fact, and the joint committee, if satisfied of the truthfulness of the application, may issue to the applicant a set of the Mississippi Code of 1972. The joint committee may consider any official application for a set of the Mississippi Code of 1972, and if the facts warrant furnishing a code or codes as applied for, it shall be furnished to the applicant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4218; Laws, 1932, ch. 329; Laws, 1999, ch. 310, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 8, 1999).

§ 1-1-35.
Revised manuscript declared to be official Code of the state of Mississippi.

The Legislature finds and so declares that the code committee, comprised of the Attorney General, Secretary of State, chairmen of the appropriations committees and judiciary “A” and “B” committees of the House of Representatives and Senate has, to date, fulfilled its obligations and responsibilities within its statutory powers as set forth in Senate Bill No. 1964 (Chapter 465), Laws of 1970, and that the entire manuscript for the Mississippi Code of 1972, emanating from the Mississippi Code of 1930, all enactments of a general and permanent nature subsequent to the regular session of 1930 and through the regular session of 1942 comprising the original Mississippi Code of 1942, and all such enactments from adjournment of the 1942 regular session through the regular session of 1971 and now a part of the Mississippi Code of 1942, has been thoroughly analyzed by experienced and trained lawyer-editors of the lawbook publishers and by the publishers’ computer facilities, and the publishers’ findings and recommendations to the Attorney General to date have been agreed upon by and between the publishers, the Attorney General, and the code committee, and that said proposed manuscript, as prepared by The Lawyers Co-Operative Publishing Company and associates and approved by the attorney general, for the Mississippi Code of 1972, has been reported to the Legislature and revised, amended and adopted by the two houses of the Legislature, an enrolled draft of which has been prepared by the said code committee, said manuscript is hereby approved, adopted and declared to be the official code of the State of Mississippi on the first day of November, 1973.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 21-06; Laws, 1972, ch. 394, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 1-1-37.
Enrollment of the Code of 1972.

In the enrollment of the Code of 1972, it shall be sufficient and legal to enroll the code either by clipping the text from the original code or from other sources and attaching the same on paper approximately 81/2 X 11 inches, and/or by writing the same in longhand or typewriter, and/or by some method of photographic reproduction, and where necessary making corrections in the text before final approval and signature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 21-12; Laws, 1972, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1972).

§ 1-1-39.
Deposition and preservation of enrolled draft.

The enrolled draft of the official Mississippi Code of 1972 shall be deposited in the office of the Secretary of State, and shall be carefully preserved by that officer as the official code of the public statute laws of this state, adopted and declared to be such by Section 1-1-35.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 21-07; Laws, 1972, ch. 394, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).